Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 12 Partnerships
7-12-39.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 28; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-40.
Dissolution defined. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The dissolution of a partnership is the change in the relation of the partners caused by any partner ceasing to be associated in the carrying on as distinguished from the winding up of the business.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 29.

7-12-40.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 29; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-41.
Partnership not terminated by dissolution. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

On dissolution the partnership is not terminated, but continues until the winding up of partnership affairs is completed.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 30.

7-12-41.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 30; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-42.
Causes of dissolution. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Dissolution is caused:

Without violation of the agreement between the partners:

By the termination of the definite term or particular undertaking specified in the agreement;

By the express will of any partner when no definite term or particular undertaking is specified;

By the express will of all the partners who have not assigned their interests or suffered them to be charged for their separate debts, either before or after the termination of any specified term or particular undertaking;

By the expulsion of any partner from the business bona fide in accordance with the power conferred by the agreement between the partners;

In contravention of the agreement between the partners, where the circumstances do not permit a dissolution under any other provision of this section, by the express will of any partner at any time;

By any event that makes it unlawful for the business of the partnership to be carried on or for the members to carry it on in partnership;

By the death of any partner;

By the bankruptcy of any partner or the partnership;

By decree of court under §

7-12-43

.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 31.

7-12-42.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 31; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-43.
Dissolution by decree of court. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

On application by or for a partner, the court shall decree a dissolution whenever:

A partner has been declared mentally incompetent in any judicial proceeding or is shown to be of unsound mind;

A partner becomes in any other way incapable of performing his or her part of the partnership contract;

A partner has been guilty of any conduct that tends to affect prejudicially the carrying on of the business;

A partner willfully or persistently commits a breach of the partnership agreement, or otherwise so conducts him or herself in matters relating to the partnership business that it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in partnership with him or her;

The business of the partnership can only be carried on at a loss;

Other circumstances render a dissolution equitable.

On the application of the purchaser of a partner’s interest under §§

7-12-38

and

7-12-39

, the court shall decree a dissolution:

After the termination of the specified term or particular undertaking;

At any time if the partnership was a partnership at will when the interest was assigned or when the charging order was issued.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 32; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 4; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 4.

7-12-43.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 32; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 4; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 4; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-44.
General effect of dissolution on authority of partner. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Except insofar as is necessary to wind up partnership affairs or to complete transactions begun but not then finished, dissolution terminates all authority of any partner to act for the partnership:

Regarding the partners:

When the dissolution is not by the act, bankruptcy, or death of a partner; or

When the dissolution is by the act, bankruptcy, or death of a partner, in cases where §

7-12-45

so requires.

With respect to persons not partners, as declared in §

7-12-46

.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 33.

7-12-44.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 33; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-45.
Right of partner to contribution from copartners after dissolution. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Where the dissolution is caused by the act, death, or bankruptcy of a partner, each partner is liable to his or her copartners for his or her share of any liability created by any partner acting for the partnership as if the partnership had not been dissolved, unless:

The dissolution being by act of any partner, the partner acting for the partnership had knowledge of the dissolution;

The dissolution being by the death or bankruptcy of a partner, the partner acting for the partnership had knowledge or notice of the death or bankruptcy; or

The liability is for a debt or obligation for which the partner is not liable as provided in §

7-12-26(b)

.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 34; P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 1.

7-12-45.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 34; P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-46.
Power of partner to bind partnership to third persons after dissolution. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

After dissolution, a partner can bind the partnership except as provided in subsection (c) by:

Any act appropriate for winding up partnership affairs or completing transactions unfinished at dissolution;

Any transaction that would bind the partnership if dissolution had not taken place, provided the other party to the transaction:

Had extended credit to the partnership prior to dissolution and had no knowledge or notice of the dissolution; or

Though he or she had not so extended credit, had nevertheless known of the partnership prior to dissolution, and, having no knowledge or notice of dissolution, the fact of dissolution had not been advertised in a newspaper of general circulation in the place (or in each place if more than one) at which the partnership business was regularly carried on.

The liability of a partner under subsection (a)(2) shall be satisfied out of partnership assets alone, when the partner had been, prior to dissolution:

Unknown as a partner to the person with whom the contract is made; and

So far unknown and inactive in partnership affairs that the business reputation of the partnership could not be said to have been in any degree due to his or her connection with it.

The partnership is in no case bound by any act of a partner after dissolution where:

The partnership is dissolved because it is unlawful to carry on the business, unless the act is appropriate for winding up partnership affairs;

The partner has become bankrupt; or

The partner has no authority to wind up partnership affairs, except by a transaction with one who:

Had extended credit to the partnership prior to dissolution and had no knowledge or notice of his or her want of authority; or

Had not extended credit to the partnership prior to dissolution, and, having no knowledge or notice of his or her want of authority, the fact of his or her want of authority has not been advertised in the manner provided for advertising the fact of dissolution in subsection (a)(2)(ii).

Nothing in this section affects the liability under §

7-12-27

of any person who after dissolution represents him or herself or consents to another representing him or her as a partner in a partnership engaged in carrying on business.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 35.

7-12-46.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 35; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-47.
Effect of dissolution on partner’s existing liability. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The dissolution of the partnership does not of itself discharge the existing liability of any partner.

A partner is discharged from any existing liability upon dissolution of the partnership by an agreement to that effect between himself or herself, the partnership creditor, and the person or partnership continuing the business. An agreement may be inferred from the course of dealing between the creditor having knowledge of the dissolution and the person or partnership continuing the business.

Where a person agrees to assume the existing obligations of a dissolved partnership, the partners whose obligations have been assumed are discharged from any liability to any creditor of the partnership who, knowing of the agreement, consents to a material alteration in the nature or time of payment of the obligations.

The individual property of a deceased partner is liable for those obligations of the partnership incurred while he or she was a partner and for which he or she is liable under §

7-12-26

, but subject to the prior payment of his or her separate debts.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 36; P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 1.

7-12-47.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 36; P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-48.
Right to wind up. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Unless otherwise agreed, the partners who have not wrongfully dissolved the partnership or the legal representative of the last surviving partner, not bankrupt, has the right to wind up the partnership affairs; provided, that any partner, his or her legal representative, or his or her assignee may obtain winding up by the court upon cause shown.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 37.

7-12-48.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 37; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-49.
Rights of partners to application of partnership property. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

When dissolution is caused in any way, except in contravention of the partnership agreement, each partner, as against his or her copartners and all persons claiming through them in respect of their interests in the partnership, unless otherwise agreed, may have the partnership property applied to discharge its liabilities, and the surplus applied to pay in cash the net amount owing to the respective partners. But if dissolution is caused by the expulsion of a bona fide partner under the partnership agreement, and if the expelled partner is discharged from all partnership liabilities, either by payment or agreement under §

7-12-47(b)

, he or she receives in cash only the net amount due him or her from the partnership.

When dissolution is caused in contravention of the partnership agreement, the rights of the partners are as follows:

Each partner who has not wrongfully caused dissolution has:

All the rights specified in subsection (a); and

The right, as against each partner who has wrongfully caused the dissolution, to damages for breach of the agreement.

The partners who have not wrongfully caused the dissolution, if they all desire to continue the business in the same name, either by themselves or jointly with others, may do so during the agreed term for the partnership and for that purpose may possess the partnership property, provided they secure the payment by bond approved by the court, or pay to any partner who has wrongfully caused the dissolution, the value of his or her interest in the partnership at the dissolution, less any damages recoverable under subsection (b)(1)(ii), and in like manner indemnify him or her against all present or future partnership liabilities.

A partner who has wrongfully caused the dissolution has:

If the business is not continued under the provisions of subsection (b)(2), all the rights of a partner under subsection (a), subject to subsection (b)(1)(ii);

If the business is continued under subsection (b)(2), the right as against his or her copartners, and all claiming through them as to their interests in the partnership, to have the value of his or her interest in the partnership, less any damages caused to his or her copartners by the dissolution, ascertained and paid to him or her in cash, or the payment secured by bond approved by the court, and to be released from all existing liabilities of the partnership; but in ascertaining the value of the partner’s interest, the value of the good will of the business is not considered.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 38; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 12.

7-12-49.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 38; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 12; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-50.
Rights where partnership is dissolved for fraud or misrepresentation. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Where a partnership contract is rescinded on the ground of the fraud or misrepresentation of one of the parties to the contract, the party entitled to rescind is, without prejudice to any other right, entitled to:

A lien on, or right of retention of, the surplus of the partnership property, after satisfying the partnership liabilities to third persons, for any sum of money paid by him or her for the purchase of an interest in the partnership and for any capital or advances contributed by him; and

Stand, after all liabilities to third persons have been satisfied, in the place of the creditors of the partnership for any payments made by him or her as to the partnership liabilities; and

Indemnification by the person guilty of the fraud or making the representation against all debts and liabilities of the partnership.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 39.

7-12-50.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 39; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-51.
Rules for distribution. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

In settling accounts between the partners after dissolution, the following rules are observed, subject to any agreement to the contrary:

The assets of the partnership are:

The partnership property;

The contributions of the partners specified in subdivision (4).

The liabilities of the partnership rank in order of payment, as follows:

Those owing to creditors other than partners;

Those owing to partners other than for capital and profits;

Those owing to partners in respect of capital;

Those owing to partners in respect of profits.

The assets are applied in the order of their declaration in subdivision (1) to the satisfaction of the liabilities.

Except as provided in §

7-12-26(b)

, the partners shall contribute, as provided by §

7-12-29(1)

, the amount necessary to satisfy the liabilities; but if any, but not all, of the partners are insolvent, or not being subject to process, refuse to contribute, the other partners shall contribute their share of the liabilities, and, in the relative proportions in which they share the profits, the additional amount necessary to pay the liabilities.

An assignee for the benefit of creditors of any person appointed by the court has the right to enforce the contributions specified in subdivision (4).

Any partner, or his or her legal representative, has the right to enforce the contributions specified in subdivision (4), to the extent of the amount that he or she has paid in excess of his or her share.

The individual property of a deceased partner is liable for the contributions specified in subdivision (4).

When partnership property and the individual properties of the partners are in possession of a court for distribution, partnership creditors have priority on partnership property and separate creditors on individual property, saving the rights of lien or secured creditors as previously.

Where a partner has become bankrupt, or his or her estate is insolvent, the claims against his or her separate property rank in the following order:

Those owing to separate creditors;

Those owing to partnership creditors;

Those owing to partners by way of contribution.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 40; P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 1.

7-12-51.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 40; P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-52.
Liability of persons continuing the business in certain cases. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

When any new partner is admitted into an existing partnership, or when any partner retires and assigns (or the representative of the deceased partner assigns) his or her rights in partnership property to two (2) or more of the partners, or to one or more of the partners, and one or more third persons, if the business is continued without liquidation of the partnership affairs, creditors of the first or dissolved partnership are also creditors of the partnership continuing the business.

When all but one partner retire and assign (or the representative of the deceased partner assigns) their rights in partnership property to the remaining partner, who continues the business without liquidation of partnership affairs, either alone or with others, creditors of the dissolved partnership are also creditors of the person or partnership continuing the business.

When any partner retires or dies and the business of the dissolved partnership is continued as described in subsections (a) and (b), with the consent of the retired partners or the representative of the deceased partner, but without any assignment of his or her right in partnership property, rights of creditors of the dissolved partnership and of the creditors of the person or partnership continuing the business are as if the assignment had been made.

When all the partners or their representatives assign their rights in partnership property to one or more third persons who promise to pay the debts and who continue the business of the dissolved partnerships, creditors of the dissolved partnerships are also creditors of the person or partnership continuing the business.

When any partner wrongfully causes a dissolution and the remaining partners continue the business under the provision of §

7-12-49(b)(2)

, either alone or with others, and without liquidation of the partnership affairs, creditors of the dissolved partnership are also creditors of the person or partnership continuing the business.

When a partner is expelled and the remaining partners continue the business either alone or with others, without liquidation of the partnership affairs, creditors of the dissolved partnership are also creditors of the person or partnership continuing the business.

The liability of a third person becoming a partner in the partnership continuing the business, under this section, to the creditors of the dissolved partnership is satisfied out of partnership property only.

When the business of a partnership after dissolution is continued under any conditions described in this section, the creditors of the dissolved partnership, as against the separate creditors of the retiring or deceased partner or the representative of the deceased partner, have a prior right to any claim of the retired partner or the representative of the deceased partner against the person or partnership continuing the business, on account of the retired or deceased partner’s interest in the dissolved partnership or on account of any consideration promised for the interest or for his or her right in partnership property.

Nothing in this section can be held to modify any right of creditors to set aside any assignment on the ground of fraud.

The use by the person or partnership continuing the business of the partnership name, or the name of a deceased partner as part of it, does not of itself make the individual property of the deceased partner liable for any debts contracted by the person or partnership.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 41.

7-12-52.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 41; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-53.
Rights of retiring or estate of deceased partner when the business is continued. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

When any partner retires or dies, and the business is continued under any of the conditions described in subsection (a), (b), (c), (e) or (f) of §

7-12-52

, or §

7-12-49(b)(2)

, without any settlement of accounts as between him or her or his or her estate and the person or partnership continuing the business, unless otherwise agreed, he or she or his or her legal representative as against the persons or partnership may have the value of his or her interest at the date of dissolution ascertained, and shall receive as an ordinary creditor an amount equal to the value of his or her interest in the dissolved partnership with interest, or, at his or her option or at the option of his or her legal representative, in lieu of interest, the profits attributable to the use of his or her right in the property of the dissolved partnership; provided, that the creditors of the dissolved partnership as against the separate creditors, or the representative of the retired or deceased partner, have priority on any claim arising under this section as provided by §

7-12-52(h)

.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 42.

7-12-53.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 42; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-54.
Accrual of actions. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The right to an account of his or her interest accrues to any partner, or his or her legal representative, as against the winding up partners or the surviving partners or the person or partnership continuing the business, at the date of dissolution, in the absence of any agreement to the contrary.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 43.

7-12-54.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 43; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-55.
Other laws preserved. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Nothing contained in §§

7-12-1

2 —

7-12-55

affects the provisions of §§

7-12-1

—

7-12-11

or of chapter 13 of this title.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 44.

7-12-55.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 44; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-56.
Registered limited-liability partnerships. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

To become, and to continue as, a registered limited-liability partnership, a partnership shall file with the secretary of state an application, or a renewal application, stating the name of the partnership, the address of its principal office, if the partnership’s principal office is not located in this state, the address of a registered office and the name and address of a registered agent for service of process in this state that a partnership is required to maintain. In addition, partnerships under this section shall provide the names and addresses of all resident partners, the place where the business records of the partnership are maintained, or if more than one location for business records is maintained, then the principal place of business of the partnership, number, a brief statement of the business in which the partnership engaged, and that the partnership applies for status, or renewal of its status, as a registered limited-liability partnership.

The application or renewal application shall be executed by a majority in interest of the partners or by one or more partners authorized to execute an application or renewal application.

The application shall be accompanied by a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for each partnership’s initial filing.

Renewal applications are to be filed yearly and are to be accompanied by a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

The secretary of state shall register as a registered limited-liability partnership, and shall renew the registration of any limited-liability partnership, any partnership that submits a completed application or renewal application with the required fee.

Registration is effective for one year after the date an application is filed, unless voluntarily withdrawn by filing with the secretary of state a written withdrawal notice executed by a majority in interest of the partners or by one or more partners authorized to execute a withdrawal. Registration, whether pursuant to an original application or a renewal application, as a registered limited-liability partnership is renewed if, during the sixty-day (60) period preceding the date the application or renewal application otherwise would have expired, the partnership filed with the secretary of state a renewal application. A renewal application expires one year after the date an original application would have expired if the last renewal of the application had not occurred.

The status of a partnership as a registered limited-liability partnership is not affected by changes after the filing of an application or a renewal application in the information stated in the application or renewal application.

The secretary of state may provide forms for application for, or renewal of, registration. Any renewals shall maintain resident partners as set out in this section.

A partnership that registers as a registered limited-liability partnership is not deemed to have dissolved as a result of that registration and is for all purposes the same partnership that existed before the registration and continues to be a partnership under the laws of this state. If a registered limited-liability partnership dissolves, a partnership that is a successor to the registered limited-liability partnership and that intends to be a registered limited-liability partnership is not required to file a new application and is deemed to have filed any documents required or permitted under this chapter that were filed by the predecessor partnership.

The fact that an application or renewal application is on file in the office of the secretary of state is notice that the partnership is a registered limited-liability partnership and is notice of all other facts stated in the application or renewal application.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 13, § 3.

7-12-56.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 13, § 3; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-57.
Name of registered limited-liability partnerships. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The name of a registered limited-liability partnership contains the words “registered limited-liability partnership” or the abbreviation “L.L.P” or “LLP” as the last words or letters of its name.

The name shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of any domestic for-profit or nonprofit corporation, or any domestic limited partnership, or any domestic limited-liability company or any registered limited-liability partnership existing under the laws of the state, or the name of any foreign for-profit or nonprofit corporation, or foreign limited partnership, or foreign limited-liability company, or foreign registered limited-liability partnership authorized to transact business in this state, or a name the exclusive right to which is, at the time filed, reserved or registered in the manner provided under this title, subject to the following:

This provision does not apply if the applicant files with the secretary of state a certified copy of a final decree of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state; and

The name may be the same as the name of a corporation, or limited-liability company, or registered limited-liability partnership, the certificate of incorporation, authority, organization, or registration of which has been revoked by the secretary of state as permitted by law and the revocation has not been withdrawn within one year from the date of the revocation.

Words and/or abbreviations that are required by statute to identify the particular type of business entity shall be disregarded when determining if a name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the term “distinguishable upon the record” for the administration of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 7; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 54, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 60, § 3.

7-12-57.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 7; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 7; P.L. 2011, ch. 54, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 60, § 3; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-58.
Insurance or financial responsibility of registered limited-liability partnerships. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A registered limited-liability partnership that is to perform professional services as defined in §

7-5.1-2

shall carry, if reasonably available, liability insurance of a kind that is designed to cover the kinds of negligence, wrongful acts, or misconduct for which liability is limited by §

7-12-26(b)

. The insurance shall be in the aggregate amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) multiplied by the number of professional employees of the registered limited-liability partnership as of the policy anniversary date; provided, that in no case shall the coverage be less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) but in no event shall the necessary coverage exceed a maximum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); provided, further, that any policy for insurance coverage may include a deductible provision in any amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each claim multiplied by the number of professional employees of the limited-liability partnership as of the date of the issuance of the policy. The policy or policies of insurance may be subject to any terms, conditions, exclusions and endorsements that are typically contained in policies of this type.

If, in any proceeding, compliance by a partnership with the requirements of subsection (a) is disputed:

That issue is determined by the court, and

The burden of proof of compliance is on the person who claims the limitation of liability in §

7-12-26(b)

.

If a registered limited-liability partnership is in compliance with the requirements of subsection (a), the requirements of this section shall not be admissible or in any way be made known to a jury in determining an issue of liability for or extent of the debt or obligation or damages in question.

Insurance is reasonably available for the purpose of subsection (a) if, at the time that the coverage would apply to the negligence, wrongful acts, or misconduct in question, it was reasonably available to similar types of partnerships through the admitted or eligible surplus lines market.

A registered limited-liability partnership is considered to be in compliance with subsection (a) if the partnership provides five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of funds specifically designated and segregated for the satisfaction of judgments against the partnership based on the forms of negligence, wrongful acts, and misconduct for which liability is limited by §

7-12-26(b)

by:

Deposit in trust or in bank escrow of cash, bank certificates of deposit, or United States Treasury obligations; or

A bank letter of credit or insurance company bonds.

To the extent that a partnership maintains liability insurance or segregated funds pursuant to the laws or regulations of another jurisdiction, the liability insurance or segregated funds are deemed to satisfy this section if the amount hereof is equal to or greater than the amount specified in subsection (a) or (e).

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 235, § 1.

7-12-58.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 235, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-59.
Applicability to foreign and interstate commerce. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership, including a registered limited-liability partnership, formed and existing pursuant to an agreement governed by this chapter, may conduct its business, carry on its operations and have and exercise the powers granted by this chapter in any state, territory, district or possession of the United States, or in any foreign country.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the legal existence of partnerships, including registered limited-liability partnerships, formed in this state are recognized outside the boundaries of this state and that, subject to any reasonable requirement of registration, a partnership, including a registered limited-liability partnership, formed pursuant to an agreement governed by this chapter and transacting business outside this state is granted the protection of full faith and credit under the Constitution of the United States.

The liability of partners in a partnership, including registered limited-liability partnerships, formed and existing pursuant to an agreement governed by this chapter for the debts and obligations of the partnership, is at all times determined exclusively by the laws of this state.

Before transacting business in this state, a foreign registered limited-liability partnership shall comply with any statutory or administrative registration or filing requirements governing the specific type of business in which the partnership is engaged, and file a notice with the secretary of state, on any forms that the Secretary provides, stating:

The name of the partnership;

The jurisdiction, the laws of which govern its partnership agreement and under which it is registered as a limited-liability partnership;

The address of its principal office;

If the partnership’s principal office is not located in this state;

The address of a registered office and the name and address of a registered agent for service of process in this state that the partnership shall be required to maintain;

The names and addresses of all resident partners in this state;

A brief statement of the business in which the partnership engages;

Any other information that the partnership determines to include;

A statement that the partnership is a registered limited-liability partnership. The notice shall be accompanied by a fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000). The notice is effective for two (2) years from the date of filing, after which time the partnership shall file a new notice. The filing of the notice with the secretary of state makes it unnecessary to file any other documents under §§

6-1-1

—

6-1-4

.

The name of a foreign registered limited-liability partnership doing business in this state shall contain the words “Registered Limited-Liability Partnership” or “L.L.P.” or “LLP”, or any other similar words or abbreviation as are required or authorized by the laws of the state where the partnership is registered, as the last words or letters of its name.

The internal affairs of foreign registered limited-liability partnerships, including the liability of partners for debts, obligations, and liabilities of, or chargeable to, the partnership or another partner or partners, are subject to and governed by the laws of the jurisdiction in which the foreign registered limited-liability partnership is registered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 80, § 1.

7-12-59.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 80, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-60.
Filing of returns with the tax administrator — Annual charge.

For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2012, a limited-liability partnership registered under §

7-12-56

, shall file a return in the form and containing the information as prescribed by the tax administrator as follows:

If the fiscal year of the limited-liability partnership is the calendar year, on or before the fifteenth day of April in the year following the close of the fiscal year; and

If the fiscal year of the limited-liability partnership is not a calendar year, on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the close of the fiscal year.

For tax years beginning after December 31, 2015, a limited-liability partnership registered under §

7-12-56

, shall file a return, in the form and containing the information as prescribed by the tax administrator, and shall be filed on or before the date a federal tax return is due to be filed, without regard to extension.

An annual charge, equal to the minimum tax imposed upon a corporation under §

44-11-2(e)

, shall be due on the filing of the limited-liability partnership’s return filed with the tax administrator and shall be paid to the division of taxation.

The annual charge is delinquent if not paid by the due date for the filing of the return and an addition of one hundred dollars ($100) to the charge is then due.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 13, § 4.